Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1961
Quality rating and improvement system
incentives and support.

Quality rating and improvement system incentives and support
under the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act shall include, but not be limited
to:

(1) Tiered child
care subsidy reimbursements as provided in section 68-1206 based upon quality
scale ratings of step three or higher that reflect the cost of higher quality
programs and promote affordability of high-quality child care and early childhood
education programs for all families;

(2) Incentive bonuses given to providers
of child care and early childhood education programs upon completion of specific
requirements of step two ratings or higher to improve quality based upon the
quality rating criteria established pursuant to sections 71-1956 and 71-1958;

(3) Professional
development, training, and scholarships developed in collaboration with community-based
organizations, postsecondary education representatives, and other stakeholders;

(4) Support
that expands family engagement in and understanding of high-quality early
childhood education in ways that are inclusive and respectful of diversity
of families and children with special needs; and

(5) Other incentives as
necessary to carry out the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 10.